test/src/morphology/V-ngaramzj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ӈарамзь: # Verb 'to get bigger' Type 13-A (even-syllable stem) - partial paradigm
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈарядмʼ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈарян
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈаря
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈаряниʼ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈарядиʼ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈаряхаʼ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈаряваˮ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈарядаˮ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈаряˮ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈадимядамзь
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈадимянась
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈадимясь
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈадимянинзь
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈадимядинзь
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈадимяханзь
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈадимяваць
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈадимядаць
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈадимяць
     
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+InfImprf: ӈарма  
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+InfPrf: ӈарвоˮма  
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+PrcImprf: [ӈарамда, ӈармда]
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+PrcPrf: ӈармы
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+PrcFut: ӈарманда   
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+PrcNeg: ӈармадавэй
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Ger: ӈарамзь 
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+GerFin: ӈарманзь      
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Subord+Abs: ӈарамбˮ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Evas+Abs: ӈармоӈгад
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+ConNeg: ӈаравˮ
     ӈарамзь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: ӈарамдˮ
